apertium_tutorial/apertium-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>
   <sdef n="vblex"/>
   <sdef n="pri"/>
   <sdef n="prn"/>
   <sdef n="subj"/>
   <sdef n="p1"/>
   <sdef n="p2"/>
   <sdef n="p3"/>
</sdefs>
<pardefs>
<pardef n="gramophone__n">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
   <e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
   <e><p><l>I</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>You</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>It</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>We</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>They</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


</pardefs>
<section id="main" type="standard">
<e lm="gramophone"><i>gramophone</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
<e lm="record player"><i>record<b/>player</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
<e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
